California statutes. Penal Code
 (a), the court shall recall the sentence and resentence the defendant. The review and resentencing shall be completed as follows:

(1) By October 1, 2022, for individuals who have served their base term and any other enhancement and are currently serving a sentence based on the enhancement.

(2) By December 31, 2023, for all other individuals.

(d) (1) Resentencing pursuant to this section shall result in a lesser sentence than the one originally imposed as a result of the elimination of the repealed enhancement, unless the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that imposing a lesser sentence would endanger public safety. Resentencing pursuant to this section shall not result in a longer sentence
 than the one originally imposed.

(2) The court shall apply the sentencing rules of the Judicial Council and apply any other changes in law that reduce sentences or provide for judicial discretion so as to eliminate disparity of sentences and to promote uniformity of sentencing.

(3) The court may consider postconviction factors, including, but not limited to, the disciplinary record and record of rehabilitation of the defendant while incarcerated, evidence that reflects whether age, time served, and diminished physical condition, if any, have reduced the defendant’s risk for future violence, and evidence that reflects that circumstances have changed since the original sentencing so that continued incarceration is no longer in the interest of justice.

(4) Unless the court originally imposed the upper term, the court may not impose a sentence exceeding the middle term unless there are circumstances in aggravation that justify the imposition of a term of imprisonment exceeding the middle term, and those facts have been stipulated to by the defendant, or have been found true beyond a reasonable doubt at trial by the jury or by the judge in a court trial.

(5) The court shall appoint counsel.

(e) The parties may waive a resentencing hearing. If the hearing is not waived, the resentencing hearing may be conducted remotely through the use of remote technology, if the defendant agrees.

(f) Commencing on January 1,
 2025, an individual who has been convicted of a sexually violent offense as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6600 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and sentenced to death or a life term without the possibility of parole, who, as of January 1, 2025, has not had their judgment reviewed and verified by the sentencing court as provided in subdivision (c), is not eligible for recall and resentencing under this section. This subdivision does not apply retroactively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 979, Sec. 2.   (SB 285)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.8. Pregnant and Parenting Women’s Alternative Sentencing Program Act [1174. - 1174.9.]

1174.

This chapter shall be known as the Pregnant and Parenting Women’s Alternative Sentencing Program Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.1.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Agency” means the private agency selected by the department to operate this program.

(b) “Construction” means the purchase, new construction, reconstruction, remodeling, renovation, or replacement of facilities, or a combination thereof.

(c) “County” means each individual county as represented by the county board of supervisors.

(d) “Court” means the superior court sentencing the offender to the custody of the department.

(e) “Department” means the Department of Corrections.

(f) “Facility” means the nonsecure physical buildings, rooms, areas, and equipment.

(g) “Program” means an intensive substance abusing pregnant and parenting women’s alternative sentencing program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the unencumbered balance of Item 5240-311-751 of Section 2 of the Budget Act of 1990 shall revert to the unappropriated surplus of the 1990 Prison Construction Fund. The sum of fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) is hereby appropriated to the Department of Corrections from the 1990 Prison Construction Fund for site acquisition, site studies, environmental studies, master planning, architectural programming, schematics, preliminary plans, working drawings, construction, and long lead and equipment items for the purpose of constructing facilities for pregnant and parenting women’s alternative sentencing programs. These funds shall not be expended for any operating costs, including those costs reimbursed by the department pursuant to subdivision (c) of
 Section 1174.3. Funds not expended pursuant to this chapter shall be used for planning, construction, renovation, or remodeling by, or under the supervision of, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, of community-based facilities for programs designed to reduce drug use and recidivism, including, but not limited to, restitution centers, facilities for the incarceration and rehabilitation of drug offenders, multipurpose correctional centers, and centers for intensive programs for parolees. These funds shall not be expended until legislation authorizing the establishment of these programs is enacted. If the Legislature finds that the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation has made a good faith effort to site community-based facilities, but funds designated for these community-based facilities are unexpended as of January 1, 1998, the Legislature may appropriate these funds for other Level I housing.

(b) The Department of
 Corrections and Rehabilitation shall purchase, design, construct, and renovate facilities in counties or multicounty areas with a population of more than 450,000 people pursuant to this chapter. The department shall target for selection, among other counties, Los Angeles County, San Diego County, and a bay area, central valley, and an inland empire county as determined by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation. The department, in consultation with the State Department of Health Care Services, shall design core alcohol and drug treatment programs, with specific requirements and standards. Residential facilities shall be licensed by the State Department of Health Care Services in accordance with provisions of the Health and Safety Code governing licensure of alcoholism or drug abuse recovery or treatment facilities. Residential and nonresidential programs shall be certified by the State Department of Health Care Services as meeting its standards for perinatal services. Funds shall be
 awarded to selected agency service providers based upon all of the following criteria and procedures:

(1) A demonstrated ability to provide comprehensive services to pregnant women or women with children who are substance abusers consistent with this chapter. Criteria shall include, but not be limited to, each of the following:

(A) The success records of the types of programs proposed based upon standards for successful programs.

(B) Expertise and actual experience of persons who will be in charge of the proposed program.

(C) Cost-effectiveness, including the costs per client served.

(D) A demonstrated ability to implement a program as expeditiously as possible.

(E) An ability to accept referrals and participate in a process with the probation department determining eligible candidates for the program.

(F) A demonstrated ability to seek and obtain supplemental funding as required in support of the overall administration of this facility from any county, state, or federal source that may serve to support this program, including the State Department of Health Care Services, the Office of Emergency Services, the State Department of Social Services, the State Department of State Hospitals, or any county public health department. In addition, the agency shall also attempt to secure other available funding from all county, state, or federal sources for program implementation.

(G) An ability to provide intensive supervision of the program participants to ensure complete daily
 programming.

(2) Staff from the department shall be available to selected agencies for consultation and technical services in preparation and implementation of the selected proposals.

(3) The department shall consult with existing program operators that are then currently delivering similar program services, the State Department of Health Care Services, and others it may identify in the development of the program.

(4) Funds shall be made available by the department to the agencies selected to administer the operation of this program.

(5) Agencies shall demonstrate an ability to provide offenders a continuing supportive network of outpatient drug treatment and other services upon the women’s completion of the program and reintegration into the
 community.

(6) The department may propose any variation of types and sizes of facilities to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(7) The department shall secure all other available funding for its eligible population from all county, state, or federal sources.

(8) Each program proposal shall include a plan for the required 12-month residential program, plus a 12-month outpatient transitional services program to be completed by participating women and children.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 22, Sec. 77.   (AB 75)   Effective June 27, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 110 of Ch. 22.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.3.

(a) The department shall ensure that the facility designs provide adequate space to carry out this chapter, including the capability for nonsecure housing, programming, child care, food services, treatment services, educational or vocational services, intensive day treatment, and transitional living skills services.

(b) The agency selected to operate the program shall administer and operate the center and program consistent with the criteria set forth in this chapter and any criteria established by the department. These responsibilities shall include maintenance and compliance with all laws, regulations, and health standards. The department shall contract to reimburse the agency selected to operate this program for women who would otherwise be sentenced to state prison based upon actual costs not provided by other funding sources.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code shall not apply to any facility used for multiperson residential use in the last five years, including, but not limited to, motels, hotels, long-term care facilities, apartment buildings, and rooming houses, or to any project for which facilities intended to house no more than 75 women and children are constructed or leased pursuant to this chapter.

(d) Proposals submitted pursuant to this chapter are exempt from approval and submittal of plans and specifications to the Joint Legislative Committee on Prison Construction Operations and other legislative fiscal committees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.4.

(a) Persons eligible for participation in this alternative sentencing program shall meet all of the following criteria:

(1) Pregnant women with an established history of substance abuse, or pregnant or parenting women with an established history of substance abuse who have one or more children under six years old at the time of entry into the program. For women with children, at least one eligible child shall reside with the mother in the facility.

(2) Never served a prior prison term for, nor been convicted in the present proceeding of, committing or attempting to commit, any of the following offenses:

(A) Murder or voluntary manslaughter.

(B) Mayhem.

(C) Rape.

(D) Kidnapping.

(E) Sodomy by force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person.

(F) Oral copulation by force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person.

(G) Lewd acts on a child under 14 years of age, as defined in Section 288.

(H) Any felony punishable by death or imprisonment in the state prison for life.

(I) Any felony in which the defendant inflicts great bodily injury on any person, other than an accomplice, that has been charged and proved as provided for in Section 12022.53, 12022.7, or 12022.9, or any felony in which the defendant uses a firearm, as provided in Section 12022.5, 12022.53, or 12022.55, in which the use has been charged and proved.

(J) Robbery.

(K) Any robbery perpetrated in an inhabited dwelling house or trailer coach as defined in the Vehicle Code, or in the inhabited portion of any other building, wherein it is charged and proved that the defendant personally used a deadly or dangerous weapon, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 12022, in the commission of that robbery.

(L) Arson in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 451.

(M) Sexual penetration in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 289 if the act is accomplished against the victim’s will by force, violence, duress, menace, or fear of immediate and unlawful bodily injury on the victim or another person.

(N) Rape or sexual penetration in concert, in violation of Section 264.1.

(O) Continual sexual abuse of a child in violation of Section 288.5.

(P) Assault with intent to commit mayhem, rape, sodomy, oral copulation, rape in concert with another, lascivious acts upon a child, or sexual penetration.

(Q) Assault with a deadly weapon or with force likely to produce great bodily injury in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 245.

(R) Any violent felony defined in Section 667.5.

(S) A violation of Section 12022.

(T) A violation of Section 18745.

(U) Burglary of the first degree.

(V) A violation of Section 11351, 11351.5, 11352, 11353, 11358, 11359, 11360, 11370.1, 11370.6, 11378, 11378.5, 11379, 11379.5, 11379.6, 11380, or 11383 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Has not been sentenced to state prison for a term exceeding 36 months.

(b) Prior to sentencing, if the court proposes to give consideration to a placement, the court shall consider a written evaluation by the probation department,
 which shall include the following:

(1) Whether the defendant is eligible for participation pursuant to this section.

(2) Whether participation by the defendant and her eligible children is deemed to be in the best interests of the children.

(3) Whether the defendant is amenable to treatment for substance abuse and would benefit from participation in the program.

(4) Whether the program is deemed to be in the best interests of an eligible child of the defendant, as determined by a representative of the appropriate child welfare services agency of the county if the child is a dependent child of the juvenile court pursuant to Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(c) The district
 attorney shall make a recommendation to the court as to whether or not the defendant would benefit from the program, which the court shall consider in making its decision. If the court’s decision is without the concurrence of the district attorney, the court shall specify its reasons in writing and enter them into the record.

(d) If the court determines that the defendant may benefit from participation in this program, the court may impose a sentence of imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 with the recommendation that the defendant participate in the program pursuant to this chapter. The court shall notify the department within 48 hours of imposition of this sentence.

(e) The Director of Corrections shall consider the court’s recommendation in making a determination on the inmate’s placement in the program.

(f) Women accepted for the program by the Director of Corrections shall be delivered by the county, pursuant to Section 1202a, to the facility selected by the department. Before the director accepts a woman for the program, the county shall provide to the director the necessary information to determine her eligibility and appropriate placement status. Priority for services and aftercare shall be given to inmates who are incarcerated in a county, or adjacent to a county, in which a program facility is located.

(g) Prior to being admitted to the program, each participant shall voluntarily sign an agreement specifying the terms and conditions of participation in the program.

(h) The department may refer inmates back to the sentencing court if the department determines that an eligible inmate has not been recommended for the program. The department shall refer the inmate
 to the court by an evaluative report so stating the department’s assessment of eligibility, and requesting a recommendation by the court.

(i) Women who successfully complete the program, including the minimum of one year of transition services under intensive parole supervision, shall be discharged from parole. Women who do not successfully complete the program shall be returned to imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 where they shall serve their original sentences. These persons shall receive full credit against their original sentences for the time served in the program, pursuant to Section 2933.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 178) by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 453.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.    Amended version operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 178, Sec. 107.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.5.

The department shall be responsible for the funding and monitoring of the progress, activities, and performance of each program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.8.

(a) The department shall adopt regulations pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) to implement this chapter.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) and any other law, and except as otherwise specifically provided in this chapter, until July 1, 1996, the Director of Corrections shall have the power to implement, interpret, and make specific the changes made in this chapter by issuing director’s criteria. These criteria shall be exempt from the requirements of Articles 5 (commencing with Section 11346) and 6 (commencing with Section 11349) of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) and shall remain in effect until July 1, 1996, unless terminated or replaced by, or readopted as, emergency regulations pursuant to subdivision (c).

(c) On or before July 1, 1995, the department shall file emergency regulations to implement this chapter with the Office of Administrative Law. These emergency regulations shall be considered by the office as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, or general welfare and shall remain in effect until July 1, 1996, unless terminated or replaced by, or readopted as, permanent regulations in compliance with Articles 5 (commencing with Section 11346) and 6 (commencing with Section 11349) of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) pursuant to subdivision (d).

(d) The department shall file a certificate of compliance with the Office of Administrative Law to adopt permanent regulations on or before May 15, 1996.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 63, Sec. 2.   Effective May 9, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1174.9.

A program facility administered by the Department of Corrections pursuant to this chapter is exempt from the requirements and provisions of Chapter 3.4 (commencing with Section 1596.70), Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 1596.90), and Chapter 3.6 (commencing with Section 1597.30) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 372, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Bills of Exception [1176. - 1176.]

1176.

When written instructions have been presented, and given, modified, or refused, or when the charge of the court has been taken down by the reporter, the questions presented in such instructions or charge need not be excepted to; but the judge must make and sign an indorsement upon such instructions, showing the action of the court thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 40.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. New Trials [1179. - 1182.]

1179.

A new trial is a reëxamination of the issue in the same Court, before another jury, after a verdict has been given.

(History: Enacted 1872.)
-------------------------------------------

1180.

The granting of a new trial places the parties in the same position as if no trial had been had. All the testimony must be produced anew, and the former verdict or finding cannot be used or referred to, either in evidence or in argument, or be pleaded in bar of any conviction which might have been had under the accusatory pleading.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

1181.

When a verdict has been rendered or a finding made against the defendant, the court may, upon his application, grant a new trial, in the following cases only:

1. When the trial has been had in his absence except in cases where the trial may lawfully proceed in his absence;

2. When the jury has received any evidence out of court, other than that resulting from a view of the premises, or of personal property;

3. When the jury has separated without leave of the court after retiring to deliberate upon their verdict, or been guilty of any misconduct by which a fair and due consideration of the case has been prevented;

4. When the verdict has been decided by lot, or by any means other than a fair expression of opinion on the part of all the jurors;

5. When the court has misdirected the jury in a matter of law, or has erred in the decision of any question of law arising during the course of the trial, and when the district attorney or other counsel prosecuting the case has been guilty of prejudicial misconduct during the trial thereof before a jury;

6. When the verdict or finding is contrary to law or evidence, but if the evidence shows the defendant to be not guilty of the degree of the crime of which he was convicted, but guilty of a lesser degree thereof, or of a lesser crime included therein, the court may modify the verdict, finding or judgment accordingly without granting or ordering a new trial, and this power shall extend to any court to which the cause may be appealed;

7. When the verdict or finding is contrary to law or evidence, but in any case wherein authority is vested by statute in the trial court or jury to recommend or determine as a part of its verdict or finding the punishment to be imposed, the court may modify such verdict or finding by imposing the lesser punishment without granting or ordering a new trial, and this power shall extend to any court to which the case may be appealed;

8. When new evidence is discovered material to the defendant, and which he could not, with reasonable diligence, have discovered and produced at the trial. When a motion for a new trial is made upon the ground of newly discovered evidence, the defendant must produce at the hearing, in support thereof, the affidavits of the witnesses by whom such evidence is expected to be given, and if time is required by the defendant to procure such affidavits, the court may postpone the hearing of the motion for such length of time as, under all circumstances of the case, may seem reasonable.

9. When the right to a phonographic report has not been waived, and when it is not possible to have a phonographic report of the trial transcribed by a stenographic reporter as provided by law or by rule because of the death or disability of a reporter who participated as a stenographic reporter at the trial or because of the loss or destruction, in whole or in substantial part, of the notes of such reporter, the trial court or a judge, thereof, or the reviewing court shall have power to set aside and vacate the judgment, order or decree from which an appeal has been taken or is to be taken and to order a new trial of the action or proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 167.)
-------------------------------------------

1182.

The application for a new trial must be made and determined before judgment, the making of an order granting probation, the commitment of a defendant for observation as a mentally disordered sex offender, or the commitment of a defendant for narcotics addiction or insanity, whichever first occurs, and the order granting or denying the application shall be immediately entered by the clerk in the minutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 252.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Arrest of Judgment [1185. - 1188.]

1185.

A motion in arrest of judgment is an application on the part of the defendant that no judgment be rendered on a plea, finding, or verdict of guilty, or on a finding or verdict against the defendant, on a plea of a former conviction, former acquittal or once in jeopardy. It may be founded on any of the defects in the accusatory pleading mentioned in Section 1004, unless the objection has been waived by a failure to demur, and must be made and determined before the judgment is pronounced. When determined, the order must be immediately entered in the minutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

1186.

The court may, on its own motion, at any time before judgment is pronounced, arrest the judgment for any of the defects in the accusatory pleading upon which a motion in arrest of judgment may be founded as provided in Section 1185, by order for that purpose entered upon its minutes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1674.)
-------------------------------------------

1187.

The effect of an order arresting judgment, in a felony case, is to place the defendant in the same situation in which the defendant was immediately before the indictment was found or information filed. In a misdemeanor or infraction case, the effect is to place the defendant in the situation in which the defendant was before the trial was had.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 391.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1188.

If, from the evidence on the trial, there is reason to believe the defendant guilty, and a new indictment or information can be framed upon which he may be convicted, the court may order him to be recommitted to the officer of the proper county, or admitted to bail anew, to answer the new indictment or information. If the evidence shows him guilty of another offense, he must be committed or held thereon, and in neither case shall the verdict be a bar to another prosecution. But if no evidence appears sufficient to charge him with any offense, he must, if in custody, be discharged; or if admitted to bail, his bail is exonerated; or if money has been deposited instead of bail, it must be refunded to the defendant or to the person or persons found by the court to have deposited said money on behalf of said defendant; and the arrest of judgment shall operate as an acquittal of the charge upon which the indictment or information was founded.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1935, Ch. 657.)
-------------------------------------------



TITLE 8. OF JUDGMENT AND EXECUTION [1191. - 1233.6.]



  CHAPTER 1. The Judgment [1191. - 1210.6.]

1191.

In a felony case, after a plea, finding, or verdict of guilty, or after a finding or verdict against the defendant on a plea of a former conviction or acquittal, or once in jeopardy, the court shall appoint a time for pronouncing judgment, which shall be within 20 judicial days after the verdict, finding, or plea of guilty, during which time the court shall refer the case to the probation officer for a report if eligible for probation and pursuant to Section 1203. However, the court may extend the time not more than 10 days for the purpose of hearing or determining any motion for a new trial, or in arrest of judgment, and may further extend the time until the probation officer’s report is received and until any proceedings for granting or denying probation have been disposed of. If, in the opinion of the court, there is a reasonable ground for believing a defendant insane, the court may extend the time for pronouncing sentence until the question of insanity has been heard and determined, as provided in this code. If the court orders the defendant placed in a diagnostic facility pursuant to Section 1203.03, the time otherwise allowed by this section for pronouncing judgment is extended by a period equal to (1) the number of days which elapse between the date of the order and the date on which notice is received from the Director of Corrections advising whether or not the Department of Corrections will receive the defendant in the facility, and (2) if the director notifies the court that it will receive the defendant, the time which elapses until his or her return to the court from the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 931, Sec. 392.   Effective September 28, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.1.

The victim of any crime, or the parents or guardians of the victim if the victim is a minor, or the next of kin of the victim if the victim has died, have the right to attend all sentencing proceedings under this chapter and shall be given adequate notice by the probation officer of all sentencing proceedings concerning the person who committed the crime.

The victim, or up to two of the victim’s parents or guardians if the victim is a minor, or the next of kin of the victim if the victim has died, have the right to appear, personally or by counsel, at the sentencing proceeding and to reasonably express his, her, or their views concerning the crime, the person responsible, and the need for restitution. The court in imposing sentence shall consider the statements of victims, parents or guardians, and next of kin made pursuant to this section and shall state on the record its conclusion concerning whether the person would pose a threat to public safety if granted probation.

The provisions of this section shall not be amended by the Legislature except by statute passed in each house by rollcall vote entered in the journal, two-thirds of the membership concurring, or by a statute that becomes effective only when approved by the electors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 338, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.   Note: This section was added on June 8, 1982, by initiative Prop. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.10.

The definition of the term “victim” as used in Section 1191.1 includes any insurer or employer who was the victim of workers’ compensation fraud for the crimes specified in Section 549 of this code, Sections 2314 and 6152 of the Business and Professions Code, Sections 1871.4, 11760, and 11880 of the Insurance Code, and Section 3215 of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 120, Sec. 9.   Effective July 16, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.15.

(a) The court may permit the victim of any crime, his or her parent or guardian if the victim is a minor, or the next of kin of the victim if the victim has died, to file with the court a written, audiotaped, or videotaped statement, or statement stored on a CD-ROM, DVD, or any other recording medium acceptable to the court, expressing his or her views concerning the crime, the person responsible, and the need for restitution, in lieu of or in addition to the person personally appearing at the time of judgment and sentence. The court shall consider the statement filed with the court prior to imposing judgment and sentence.

Whenever an audio or video statement or statement stored on a CD-ROM, DVD, or other medium is filed with the court, a
 written transcript of the statement shall also be provided by the person filing the statement, and shall be made available as a public record of the court after the judgment and sentence have been imposed.

(b) Whenever a written, audio, or video statement or statement stored on a CD-ROM, DVD, or other medium is filed with the court, it shall remain sealed until the time set for imposition of judgment and sentence except that the court, the probation officer, and counsel for the parties may view and listen to the statement not more than two court days prior to the date set for imposition of judgment and sentence.

(c) A person or a court shall not permit any person to duplicate, copy, or reproduce by audio or visual means a statement submitted to the court under the provisions of this section.

(d) Nothing in this
 section shall be construed to prohibit the prosecutor from representing to the court the views of the victim, his or her parent or guardian, the next of kin, or the California Victim Compensation Board.

(e) In the event the court permits an audio or video statement or statement stored on a CD-ROM, DVD, or other medium to be filed, the court shall not be responsible for providing any equipment or resources needed to assist the victim in preparing the statement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 238.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.16.

The victim of any crime, or the parents or guardians of the victim if the victim is a minor, or the next of kin of the victim if the victim has died, who choose to exercise their rights with respect to sentencing proceedings as described in Section 1191.1 may, in any case where the defendant is subject to an indeterminate term of imprisonment, have their statements simultaneously recorded and preserved by means of videotape, videodisc, or any other means of preserving audio and video, if they notify the prosecutor in advance of the sentencing hearing and the prosecutor reasonably is able to provide the means to record and preserve the statement. If a video and audio record is developed, that record shall be maintained and preserved by the prosecution and used in accordance with the regulations of the Board of Prison Terms at any hearing to review parole suitability or the setting of a parole date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 902, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.2.

In providing notice to the victim pursuant to Section 1191.1, the probation officer shall also provide the victim with information concerning the victim’s right to civil recovery against the defendant, the requirement that the court order restitution for the victim, the victim’s right to receive a copy of the restitution order from the court and to enforce the restitution order as a civil judgment, the victim’s responsibility to furnish the probation department, district attorney, and court with information relevant to his or her losses, and the victim’s opportunity to be compensated from the Restitution Fund if eligible under Article 1 (commencing with Section 13959) of Chapter 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. This information shall be in
 the form of written material prepared by the Judicial Council in consultation with the California Victim Compensation Board, shall include the relevant sections of the Penal Code, and shall be provided to each victim for whom the probation officer has a current mailing address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 239.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.21.

(a) (1) The Office of Emergency Services shall develop and make available a “notification of eligibility” card for victims and derivative victims of crimes as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 13960 of the Government Code that includes, but is not limited to, the following information:
“If you have been the victim of a crime that meets the required definition, you or others may be eligible to receive payment from the California State Restitution Fund for losses directly resulting from the crime. To learn about eligibility and receive an application to receive payments, call the Victims of Crime Program at (800) 777-9229 or call your local county Victim Witness Assistance Center.”

(2) At a minimum, the Office of Emergency Services shall develop a template available for downloading on its Internet Web site the information requested in subdivision (b).

(b) In a case involving a crime as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 13960 of the Government Code, the law enforcement officer with primary responsibility for investigating the crime committed against the victim and the district attorney may provide the “notification of eligibility” card to the victim and derivative victim of a crime.

(c) The terms “victim” and “derivative victim” shall be given the same meaning given those terms in Section 13960 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 416.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.25.

The prosecution shall make a good faith attempt to notify any victim of a crime which was committed by, or is alleged to have been committed by, an in-custody informant, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1127a, within a reasonable time before the in-custody informant is called to testify. The notice shall include information concerning the prosecution’s intention to offer the in-custody informant a modification or reduction in sentence or dismissal of the case or early parole in exchange for the in-custody informant’s testimony in another case. The notification or attempt to notify the victim shall be made prior to the commencement of the trial in which the in-custody informant is to testify where the intention to call him or her is known at that time, but in no case shall the notice be made later than the time the in-custody informant is called to the stand.

Nothing contained in this section is intended to affect the right of the people and the defendant to an expeditious disposition of a criminal proceeding, as provided in Section 1050. The victim of any case alleged to have been committed by the in-custody informant may exercise his or her right to appear at the sentencing of the in-custody informant pursuant to Section 1191.1, but the victim shall not have a right to intervene in the trial in which the in-custody informant is called to testify.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 901, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

1191.3.
